Maryland, session 2025, HB1287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1287*

HOUSE BILL 1287
4–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Assault long gun” means any assault weapon listed under § 5–101(r)(2) of the
Public Safety Article.
(c) “Assault pistol” means any of the following firearms or a copy regardless of
the producer or manufacturer:
(1) AA Arms AP–9 semiautomatic pistol;
(2) Bushmaster semiautomatic pistol;
(3) Claridge HI–TEC semiautomatic pistol;
(4) D Max Industries semiautomatic pistol;
(5) Encom MK–IV, MP–9, or MP–45 semiautomatic pistol;
(6) Heckler and Koch semiautomatic SP–89 pistol;
(7) Holmes MP–83 semiautomatic pistol;
(8) Ingram MAC 10/11 semiautomatic pistol and variations including the
Partisan Avenger and the SWD Cobray;
(9) Intratec TEC–9/DC–9 semiautomatic pistol in any centerfire variation;
(10) P.A.W.S. type semiautomatic pistol;
(11) Skorpion semiautomatic pistol;
(12) Spectre double action semiautomatic pistol (Sile, F.I.E., Mitchell);
(13) UZI semiautomatic pistol;
(14) Weaver Arms semiautomatic Nighthawk pistol; or
(15) Wilkinson semiautomatic “Linda” pistol.
(d) “Assault weapon” means:
(1) an assault long gun;
(2) an assault pistol; or

HOUSE BILL 1287 3
(3) a copycat weapon.
(e) “Binary trigger system” means a device that, when installed in or attached to
a firearm, fires both when the trigger is pulled and on release of the trigger.
(f) “Bump stock” means a device that, when installed in or attached to a firearm,
increases the rate of fire of the firearm by using energy from the recoil of the firearm to
generate a reciprocating action that facilitates repeated activation of the trigger.
(g) “Burst trigger system” means a device that, when installed in or attached to a
firearm, allows the firearm to discharge two or more shots with a single pull of the trigger
by altering the trigger reset.
(H) “CONVERTIBLE PISTOL” MEANS ANY SEMIAUTOMATIC PISTOL THAT
CAN BE CONVERTED INTO A MACHINE GUN SOLELY BY THE ATTACHMENT OF A
SWITCH/AUTO–SEAR.
[(h)] (I) (1) “Copycat weapon” means:
(i) a semiautomatic centerfire rifle that can accept a detachable
magazine and has any two of the following:
1. a folding stock;
2. a grenade launcher or flare launcher; or
3. a flash suppressor;
(ii) a semiautomatic centerfire rifle that has a fixed magazine with
the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds;
(iii) a semiautomatic centerfire rifle that has an overall length of less
than 29 inches;
(iv) a semiautomatic pistol with a fixed magazine that can accept
more than 10 rounds;
(v) a semiautomatic shotgun that has a folding stock; or
(vi) a shotgun with a revolving cylinder.
(2) “Copycat weapon” does not include an assault long gun or an assault
pistol.

HOUSE BILL 1287
[(i)] (J) “Detachable magazine” means an ammunition feeding device that can
be removed readily from a firearm without requiring disassembly of the firearm action or
without the use of a tool, including a bullet or cartridge.
[(j)] (K) “Flash suppressor” means a device that functions, or is intended to
function, to perceptibly reduce or redirect muzzle flash from the shooter’s field of vision.
[(k)] (L) “Hellfire trigger” means a device that, when installed in or attached to
a firearm, disengages the trigger return spring when the trigger is pulled.
[(l)] (M) “Licensed firearms dealer” means a person who holds a dealer’s license
under Title 5, Subtitle 1 of the Public Safety Article.
[(m)] (N) (1) “Rapid fire activator” means any device, including a removable
manual or power–driven activating device, constructed so that, when installed in or
attached to a firearm:
(i) the rate at which the trigger is activated increases; or
(ii) the rate of fire increases.
(2) “Rapid fire activator” includes a bump stock, trigger crank, hellfire
trigger, binary trigger system, burst trigger system, switch/auto–sear, or a copy or a similar
device, regardless of the producer or manufacturer.
(3) “Rapid fire activator” does not include a semiautomatic replacement
trigger that improves the performance and functionality over the stock trigger.
[(n)] (O) “Switch/auto–sear” means a device that applies force to a firearm’s
trigger bar to prevent it from limiting the weapon to firing only one round each time the
trigger is depressed.
[(o)] (P) “Trigger crank” means a device that, when installed in or attached to a
firearm, repeatedly activates the trigger of the firearm through the use of a crank, a lever,
or any other part that is turned in a circular motion.
4–305.2.
A PERSON MAY NOT MANUFACTURE, SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, PURCHASE,
RECEIVE, OR TRANSFER A CONVERTIBLE PISTOL.
4–306.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a person who violates this
subtitle is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not
exceeding 3 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.

HOUSE BILL 1287 5
(b) (1) A person who uses an assault weapon, a rapid fire activator, or a
magazine that has a capacity of more than 10 rounds of ammunition, in the commission of
a felony or a crime of violence as defined in § 5–101 of the Public Safety Article is guilty of
a misdemeanor and on conviction, in addition to any other sentence imposed for the felony
or crime of violence, shall be sentenced under this subsection.
(2) (i) For a first violation, the person shall be sentenced to
imprisonment for not less than 5 years and not exceeding 20 years.
(ii) The court may not impose less than the minimum sentence of 5
years.
(iii) The mandatory minimum sentence of 5 years may not be
suspended.
(iv) Except as otherwise provided in § 4–305 of the Correctional
Services Article, the person is not eligible for parole in less than 5 years.
(3) (i) For each subsequent violation, the person shall be sentenced to
imprisonment for not less than 10 years and not exceeding 20 years.
(ii) The court may not impose less than the minimum sentence of 10
years.
(iii) A sentence imposed under this paragraph shall be consecutive to
and not concurrent with any other sentence imposed for the felony or crime of violence.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.